Nevada, session 83, SB384-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 232 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that:
1. The State of Nevada is poised to see a once in a generation
wave of federal money resulting from the passage of the
Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, Public Law 117-58, and
the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, which
will help to close the digital divide and increase the development of
broadband services and infrastructure across the State;
2. The State of Nevada needs to ensure that this historic
investment creates long-lasting broadband infrastructure that is
built by a well-trained workforce;
3. Work performed by an unqualified contractor with a
poorly trained workforce endangers the public and is not in the
best interest of the citizens of this State; and
4. Proper stewardship of public money will require that the
State of Nevada implement appropriate measures to ensure that
any grants of federal money awarded by this State for the
development of broadband services and infrastructure prioritize
issuing grants to applicants that will ensure the work is performed
safely and by a well-trained workforce and that the applicant
provides quality jobs to Nevada workers.
Sec. 3. 1. In awarding any grant of federal money for the
development of broadband services and infrastructure in
accordance with federal law, each state agency shall:
(a) Evaluate and assign a score to each application received by
the state agency based on the factors and relative weights assigned
to each factor that the state agency specified in the request for
grant applications; and
-
*SB384_R2*

– 3 –
(b) When ranking the proposals, assign a relative weight of 30
percent to an application if the applicant submits a signed
certification attesting that the applicant meets the requirements of
paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 2.
2. An applicant for a grant of federal money for the
development of broadband services and infrastructure shall
submit to a state agency with the application for the grant a signed
statement certifying that:
(a) If the applicant:
(1) Will perform some or all of the work that is financed in
whole or in part with the grant money or if such work will be
performed by a provider of broadband services, the applicant or
provider, as applicable, meets the requirements set forth in
paragraph (b) or (c); and
(2) Will subcontract some or all of the work that is financed
in whole or in part with the grant money, the subcontractor meets
the requirements set forth in paragraph (b) or (c);
(b) The applicant, provider of broadband services or
contractor, as applicable:
(1) Has a robust training program with training
requirements that are tied to titles, uniform wage scales and skill
codes recognized in the industry;
(2) Requires safety training, including, without limitation,
any safety training requirements of the Occupational Safety and
Health Administration of the United States Department of Labor,
and operates a safety program that requires drug testing;
(3) Requires work performed by the applicant, provider or
contractor, as applicable, that is financed in whole or in part with
the grant money will be performed by employees who are directly
employed by the applicant, provider or contractor, as applicable,
and that such workers will receive high-quality wages and
benefits;
(4) Has programs to promote the training and hiring of
workers from underrepresented communities; and
(5) Primarily employs a qualified local work force
consisting of residents of this State or conducts a program to
promote the hiring of residents of this State; or
(c) The applicant, provider of broadband services or contractor
licensed pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS that will perform some or
all of the work is a signatory to a collective bargaining agreement
that covers all non-supervisory employees directly employed by the
applicant, provider or contractor, as applicable, who will perform
any work financed in whole or in part with the grant money.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the
provisions of NRS 338.020 to 338.090, inclusive, do not apply to
-
*SB384_R2*

– 4 –
work performed by an applicant or provider of broadband services
that is a public work if the applicant or provider, as applicable, is a
signatory to a collective bargaining agreement.
4. Any certification submitted by an applicant for a grant
pursuant to subsection 2 must be made available on the Internet
website of the state agency which awarded the grant.
5. In addition to the requirements of subsections 1 and 2 and
except as otherwise provided in federal law, each state agency
shall require as a condition of any grant of federal money for the
development of broadband services and infrastructure in
accordance with federal law that is awarded by the state agency
that:
(a) Any certification provided by the applicant pursuant to
subsection 2 is binding upon the applicant who is awarded the
grant money; and
(b) If a contractor licensed pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS
performs any work financed in whole or in part with the grant
money, the provisions of NRS 338.020 to 338.090, inclusive, shall
apply.
6. If any federal statute or regulation precludes the granting
of federal assistance or reduces the amount of that assistance for a
particular grant because of the provisions of this section, the
provisions of this section do not apply insofar as their application
would preclude or reduce federal assistance for that work.
7. The Director of the Office of Science, Innovation and
Technology established pursuant to NRS 223.600 may adopt
regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.
8. As used in this section, “state agency” means every public
agency, bureau, board, commission, department, division, officer
or employee of the Executive Department of the State
Government.
Sec. 3.5. NRS 338.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
338.080 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 408.55086,
none of the provisions of NRS 338.020 to 338.090, inclusive, apply
to:
1. Any work, construction, alteration, repair or other
employment performed, undertaken or carried out, by or for any
railroad company or any person operating the same, whether such
work, construction, alteration or repair is incident to or in
conjunction with a contract to which a public body is a party, or
otherwise.
2. Apprentices recorded under the provisions of chapter 610 of
NRS.
3. Any contract for a public work whose estimated cost is less
than $100,000. A unit of the project must not be separated from the
-
*SB384_R2*

– 5 –
total project, even if that unit is to be completed at a later time, in
order to lower the estimated cost of the project below $100,000.
4. Any work performed for the development of broadband
services and infrastructure using grant money awarded pursuant
to section 3 of this act by the recipient of the grant money or a
provider of broadband services if the recipient or provider, as
applicable, is a signatory to a collective bargaining agreement,
unless the work is performed by a contractor who is licensed
pursuant to chapter 624 of NRS.
Sec. 4. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 3.5, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2024, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB384_R2*